test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imakizinishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imakizinishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imakizinishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imakizinishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imakizinishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imakizinishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imakizinishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imakizinishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imakizinishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imakizinishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imakizinishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imakizinishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makizinensimishinaaniban
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makizinensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makizinensimishiwaaiban
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makizinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makizinensimishiniiban
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makizinensimishini***idig, idog***
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makizinenhimishinaaniban
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makizinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makizinenhimishiwaaiban
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makizinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makizinenhimishiniiban
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makizinenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makizinensimishinaanan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makizinensimishinaanag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makizinensimishinaaning
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makizinensimishiwaaan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makizinensimishiwaaag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makizinensimishiwaaing
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makizinensimishinian
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makizinensimishiniag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makizinensimishiniing
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makizinenhimishinaanan
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makizinenhimishinaanag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makizinenhimishinaaning
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makizinenhimishiwaaan
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makizinenhimishiwaaag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makizinenhimishiwaaing
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makizinenhimishinian
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makizinenhimishiniag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makizinenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: makizinensimishibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: makizinensimishibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: makizinensimishibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makizinensimish***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makizinensimish***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makizinensimish***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: makizinenhimishibanan
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: makizinenhimishibanag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: makizinenhimishibaning
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhimish***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makizinensiminaanibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makizinensiminaanibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makizinensiminaanibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makizinensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makizinensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makizinensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinensimiwaaibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinensimiwaaibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinensimiwaaibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makizinensiminiibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makizinensiminiibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makizinensiminiibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinensimini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinensimini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinensimini***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makizinenhiminaanibanan
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makizinenhiminaanibanag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makizinenhiminaanibaning
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinenhimiwaaibanan
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinenhimiwaaibanag
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinenhimiwaaibaning
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makizinenhiminiibanan
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makizinenhiminiibanag
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makizinenhiminiibaning
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhimini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makizinensishinaanibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makizinensishinaanibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makizinensishinaanibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makizinensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makizinensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makizinensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinensishiwaaibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinensishiwaaibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinensishiwaaibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makizinensishiniibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makizinensishiniibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makizinensishiniibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinensishini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinensishini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinensishini***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makizinenhishinaanibanan
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makizinenhishinaanibanag
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makizinenhishinaanibaning
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinenhishiwaaibanan
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinenhishiwaaibanag
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinenhishiwaaibaning
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makizinenhishiniibanan
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makizinenhishiniibanag
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makizinenhishiniibaning
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhishini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makizinimishinaanibanan
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makizinimishinaanibanag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makizinimishinaanibaning
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makizinimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makizinimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makizinimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinimishiwaaibanan
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinimishiwaaibanag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinimishiwaaibaning
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makizinimishiniibanan
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makizinimishiniibanag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makizinimishiniibaning
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinimishini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinimishini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimakizinensimishinaaniban
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimakizinensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimakizinensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimakizinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimakizinensimishiniiban
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimakizinensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimakizinenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimakizinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimakizinenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimakizinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimakizinenhimishiniiban
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimakizinenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimakizinensimishinaaniban
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimakizinensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimakizinensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimakizinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimakizinensimishiniiban
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimakizinensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimakizinenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimakizinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimakizinenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimakizinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimakizinenhimishiniiban
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimakizinenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omakizinensimishinaaniban
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omakizinensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omakizinensimishiwaaiban
